Hawaii, session 2025, HB823.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1. The legislature finds that the Waianae coast, which encompasses communities from Makaha to Kahe Point, relies predominately on Farrington highway as the area's sole access route.  This dependency on a single route poses significant risks during natural disasters or accidents, when the ability to evacuate quickly is critical.  Recent studies and community feedback have highlighted the inadequacy of the area's emergency access roads, which fail to meet safety and capacity standards.  Notably, while a new emergency access road is scheduled to open in Spring 2025, concerns remain regarding the road's capacity to handle the traffic that would be involved in a large-scale evacuation. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to require and appropriate moneys for the department of transportation, in collaboration with the city and county of Honolulu, to assess and develop an improvement plan for emergency evacuation routes along the Waianae coast. SECTION 2.  (a) The department of transportation, in collaboration with the city and county of Honolulu, shall: (1)  Conduct a comprehensive assessment of existing emergency access roads along the Waianae coast to determine the state of the roads and to identify any concerns regarding the roads' safety, capacity, or accessibility; (2)  Develop a detailed plan to upgrade existing emergency access roads, or to construct new evacuation routes that meet established standards for road safety and capacity, to enable residents from Makaha to Kahe Point to evacuate quickly and safely; (3)  Evaluate the feasibility of restoring and utilizing unpaved roads, including the roads leading from Waianae to Wailua via Peacock Flats and roads in the Waianae Valley that were previously used by the United States military; and (4)  Engage with local residents to gather input and address concerns related to the proposed evacuation routes. (b)  For purposes of the assessment and plan required by subsection (a), the department of transportation may request input and assistance from the United States Navy. (c)  The department shall submit a report of its findings and recommendations, including any proposed legislation, to the legislature no later than twenty days prior to the convening of the regular session of 2026. SECTION 3.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $         or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 to assess and develop an improvement plan for emergency evacuation routes along the Waianae coast. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the department of transportation for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________